apertium-tr-tt.tr.lexc
LEXICON NINFL

%<n%>: # ; 
%<n%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON NPTOPINFL

%<np%>%<top%>: # ; 
%<adj%>:%>l%{I%}%{k%} # ; 
%<np%>%<top%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<loc%>:%'%>%{D%}%{A%}%{k%}i DAKI ; ! This makes an attributive phrase from a noun, TRmorph <loc><ki>

LEXICON NPACRINFL

%<np%>%<acr%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<acr%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 


LEXICON NPALINFL

%<np%>%<al%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<al%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON NPANTMINFL

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON NPANTFINFL

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON NPCOGINFL

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON AINFL

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON AINFL-NAT

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<n%>: # ; 
%<n%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ;  ! Dir/LR
%<n%>: NINFL-COMMON  ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r NINFL-COMMON  ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%' NINFL-COMMON  ;  ! Dir/LR

LEXICON ADVINFL

%<adv%>: # ; 


LEXICON NUMINFL

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: NINFL-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{bI%}nc%{I%} # ; ! This is <D_IncI> in TRmorph
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{bI%}nc%{I%} NINFL-COMMON ; ! This is <D_IncI> in TRmorph

LEXICON NUMERAL-LOOP

NUMERAL-LIST ;
%. NUMERAL-LIST ;
%, NUMERAL-LIST  ;
!%. NUMINFL ; ! Dir/RL
!%, NUMINFL ; ! Dir/RL
%%%<num%>:%% CASE ;
NUMINFL ;

LEXICON NUMERAL-LIST 

%0 NUMERAL-LOOP ;
1 NUMERAL-LOOP ;
2 NUMERAL-LOOP ;
3 NUMERAL-LOOP ;
4 NUMERAL-LOOP ;
5 NUMERAL-LOOP ;
6 NUMERAL-LOOP ;
7 NUMERAL-LOOP ;
8 NUMERAL-LOOP ;
9 NUMERAL-LOOP ;
%% NUMERAL-LOOP ;


LEXICON V-PERS-G1

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>n # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{k%} # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;


LEXICON V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}m clit ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  clit ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  clit ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}z  clit ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  clit ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  clit ;


LEXICON V-PERS-COP-G2

%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  clit ;
V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3 ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-OPT-G3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>y%{I%}m # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>l%{I%}m # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;

LEXICON V-PERS-IMP-G4

%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{A%}n%{A%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n #;
!%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n%{I%}z #;
!%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{A%}n%{I%}z%{A%} # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n #;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n%{I%}z #;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{A%}n%{I%}z%{A%} # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}nl%{A%}r # ;

LEXICON VINFL-COMMON

%<ger1%>:%>m%{A%} # ;
%<ger1%>:%>m%{A%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger2%>:%>m%{A%}%{K%} # ;
%<ger2%>:%>m%{A%}%{K%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger3%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}%{k%} # ;
%<ger3%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}%{k%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger4%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}ş # ;
%<ger4%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}ş NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger5%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}n # ;
%<ger5%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}n NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger8%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}c%{A%}%{k%} # ;
%<ger8%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}c%{A%}%{k%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<impp%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}r%{A%}%{k%} # ;
%<impp%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}r%{A%}%{k%} NINFL-COMMON ;

%<prc1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p # ;
%<prc1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p clit-cop ;

%<gna1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p # ;
%<gna1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p clit-cop ;

%<cont%>:%>%{bI%}yor V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<cont%>:%>%{bI%}yor clit-cop ; ! This should be renamed e.g. <cont><past> 
%<opt%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%} V-PERS-OPT-G3 ;
%<past%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<evid%>:%>m%{I%}ş V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<imp%>: V-PERS-IMP-G4 ;
%<fut%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}c%{A%}%{k%} V-PERS-COP-G2 ; 
%<cond%>:%>s%{A%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<pii%>:%>m%{A%}kt%{A%} V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<oblig%>:%>m%{A%}l%{I%} V-PERS-COP-G2 ;

!! Enumerate the possibilities for verb combinations in Turkish (go go turmorph!)
!! Unmarked entries get -t for causative if they end in l, r, or a vowel, otherwise -DIr. 
!
!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_AR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>t  VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_IR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;


!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}rt VINFL-COMMON ;
!

LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR

%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ; ! add to all!
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;

!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR
! art<iv><caus_ir><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_IR
! IRREG does not get causative (it's in the lexicon ?)
! gel<iv><caus_irreg>
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR
! IRREG does not get causative (it's in the lexicon ?)
! ay<iv><caus_irreg><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
!
!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_IR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>t VINFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON Nouns
bom:bom NINFL ; ! ""
tesir:tesir NINFL ; ! ""
epitelyum:epitelyum NINFL ; ! ""
inzimam:inzimam NINFL ; ! ""
kumuç:kumuç NINFL ; ! ""
mahur:mahur NINFL ; ! ""
pigment:pigment NINFL ; ! ""
LEXICON ProperNouns
Avustralya:Avustralya NPTOPINFL ; ! ""
Budapeşte:Budapeşte NPTOPINFL ; ! ""
Gabon:Gabon NPTOPINFL ; ! ""
Istanbul:Istanbul NPTOPINFL ; ! ""
Kopenhag:Kopenhag NPTOPINFL ; ! ""
Madrid:Madrid NPTOPINFL ; ! ""
Bosna:Bosna NPTOPINFL ; ! "Bosnia"
Rompres:Rompres NPALINFL ; ! "Rompres"
Dnevnik:Dnevnik NPALINFL ; ! ""
Beta:Beta NPALINFL ; ! ""
SEtimes:SEtimes NPALINFL ; ! ""
Sırp% Ordusu:Sırp% Ordusu NPALINFL ; ! ""
Super% Galeb% G4:Super% Galeb% G4 NPALINFL ; ! ""
Yüksek% Seçim% Kurulu:Yüksek% Seçim% Kurulu NPALINFL ; ! ""
Alfred:Alfred NPANTMINFL ; ! "Alfred"
Bobby:Bobby NPANTMINFL ; ! "Bobby"
Dan:Dan NPANTMINFL ; ! "Dan"
Enrico:Enrico NPANTMINFL ; ! "Enrico"
Jeffery:Jeffery NPANTMINFL ; ! "Jeffery"
Michele:Michele NPANTMINFL ; ! "Michele"
Salvatore:Salvatore NPANTMINFL ; ! "Salvatore"
Amy:Amy NPANTFINFL ; ! "Amy"
Carole:Carole NPANTFINFL ; ! "Carole"
Gea:Gea NPANTFINFL ; ! "Gea"
Juliet:Juliet NPANTFINFL ; ! "Juliet"
Margaret:Margaret NPANTFINFL ; ! "Margaret"
Pandora:Pandora NPANTFINFL ; ! "Pandora"
Valencia:Valencia NPANTFINFL ; ! "Valencia"
Dink:Dink NPCOGINFL ; ! ""
Kovaçeviç:Kovaçeviç NPCOGINFL ; ! ""
Stankoviç:Stankoviç NPCOGINFL ; ! ""
Najdenovski:Najdenovski NPCOGINFL ; ! "Najdenovski"
Domenech:Domenech NPCOGINFL ; ! "Domenech"
Steinberg:Steinberg NPCOGINFL ; ! "Steinberg"
Zvenkovski:Zvenkovski NPCOGINFL ; ! "Zvenkovski"
LEXICON Acronyms
BM:BM%{nin%} NPACRINFL ; ! BM'nin
DPMNE:DPMNE%{nin%} NPACRINFL ; ! "DPMNE'nin"
FT:FT%{nin%} NPACRINFL ; ! "FT'nin"
KFOR:KFOR%{un%} NPACRINFL ; ! "KFOR'un"
PIC:PIC%{nin%} NPACRINFL ; ! "PIC'nin"
SDS:SDS%{nin%} NPACRINFL ; ! "SDS'nin"
TV:TV%{nin%} NPACRINFL ; ! "TV'nin"
LEXICON Adjectives 
afacan:afacan AINFL ; ! ""
çetrefil:çetrefil AINFL ; ! ""
faşizan:faşizan AINFL ; ! ""
lastik:lasti%{k%} AINFL ; ! ""
pastoral:pastor%{pA%}l AINFL ; ! ""
ünsüz:ünsüz AINFL ; ! ""
caydırıcı:caydırıcı AINFL ; ! "deterrent"
Bulgar:Bulgar AINFL-NAT ; ! "Bulgar"
İngiliz:İngiliz AINFL-NAT ; ! "English"
Fransız:Fransız AINFL-NAT ; ! "French"
Avusturyalı:Avusturyalı AINFL-NAT ; ! ""
Libyalı:Libyalı AINFL-NAT ; ! ""
Romanyalı:Romanyalı AINFL-NAT ; ! ""
Amerikalı:Amerikalı AINFL-NAT ; ! "American"
LEXICON Adverbs 
akabinde:akabinde ADVINFL ; ! ""
belki:belki ADVINFL ; ! ""
çarçabuk:çarçabu%{k%} ADVINFL ; ! ""
erken:erken ADVINFL ; ! ""
ilkin:ilkin ADVINFL ; ! ""
nispeten:nispeten ADVINFL ; ! ""
vicdanen:vicdanen ADVINFL ; ! ""
LEXICON Verbs
gel:gel VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_IR ; ! "come"
git:gi%{t%} VIVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_AR ; ! "go"
ay:ay VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR ; ! ""
art:art VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
bat:bat VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
buy:buy VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR ; ! ""
doğ:doğ VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
taş:taş VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
uç:uç VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
yit:yit VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
şiş:şiş VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
ağıllan:ağıllan VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
edin:edin VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
çözün:çözün VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
dönele:dönele VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
gedil:gedil VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
kok:kok VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR  ; ! "smell"
kop:kop VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "shear off"
kork:kork VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR  ; ! "fear, scare"
on:on VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "be happy"
panikle:panikle VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "get into a panic"
sark:sark VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR  ; ! "depend from"
sek:sek VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "rebound"
silahlan:silahlan VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "arm"
şükret:şükret VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "render thanks"
varol:varol VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "exist"
yanıl:yanıl VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "be mistaken"
zulmet:zulmet VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "oppress"
anlaş:anlaş VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "agree"
destekle:destekle VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "support"
dol:dol VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "fill up"
giriş:giriş VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "proceed"
kan:kan VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "be cheated"
kayna:kayna VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "boil"
